test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_oneform_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    äŋgirâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äŋgirâšâm
    skovorâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skovorâšâm
    iäljárâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäljárâšâm
    pismárâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pismárâšâm
    taaidârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaidârâšâm
    oggârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oggârâšâm
    hapârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hapârâšâm
    stapârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stapârâšâm
    kákkásâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kákkásâđâm
    faškastâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: faškastâđâm
    čurgiistâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurgiistâđâm
    rantustâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rantustâšâm
    ucástâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ucástâđâm
    anattâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anattâđâm
    nahettâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nahettâđâm
    rapettâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rapettâšâm
    kopsettâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kopsettâđâm
    peittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peittâđâm
    pelhittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pelhittâđâm
    falskiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falskiittâđâm
    tuommiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuommiittâđâm
    tappiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tappiittâđâm
    fattiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fattiittâđâm
    seđŋiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: seđŋiittâđâm
    päjittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: päjittâđâm
    käskittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: käskittâđâm
    nuolttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolttâđâm
    hilgottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgottâđâm
    huškottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huškottâđâm
    almottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almottâđâm
    nurvottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurvottâđâm
    čuáguttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáguttâđâm
    skájuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skájuttâđâm
    háputtâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háputtâšâm
    váruttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váruttâđâm
    hámsutâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámsuttâđâm
    árvuttâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuttâšâm
    mášuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášuttâđâm
    tubdâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubdâttâđâm
    čuolâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâttâđâm
    čurmâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurmâttâđâm
    čonâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čonâttâđâm
    kavnâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavnâttâđâm
    kevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kevâttâđâm
    oŋâttâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oŋâttâšâm
    kuođâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuođâttâđâm
    ahevâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ahevâšâm
    jyevdivâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jyevdivâšâm
    kerivâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerivâšâm
    edirvâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: edirvâšâm
    hárávâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárávâšâm
    čuárvuđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuárvuđâđâm
    ruákášâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruákášâđâm
    kiäsáđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsáđâđâm
    čalâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čalâččâđâm
    ramâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ramâččâđâm
    lapâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lapâččâđâm
    laitâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laitâččâđâm
    aštâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aštâččâm
    uštâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uštâččâm
    pajaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paijaan
    alaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: allaan
    njalaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njallaan
    maŋaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maŋnaan
    čaraniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čarraan
    lasaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lassaan
    tavaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tavvaan
    aldaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aldan
    vuorkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaŋkin
    vuorkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tilin
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kävilin
    vuorkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noomâin
    lávluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muollânjienâin
    puigođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puuigon
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joton
    hiäjuniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäijun
    hárjániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hárján
    pieijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuárkán
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pilán
    juálániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juállán
    vuálániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuállán
    viälániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viällán
    uánániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uánnán
    huánániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huánnán
    kuárániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárrán
    puárániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puárrán
    suárániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suárrán
    tárániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táárrán
    viärániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viärrán
    šiärániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiärrán
    kásániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: káássán
    čáhániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáhháán
    čokániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čokkáán
    timániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: timmáán
    komániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kommáán
    morániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: morráán
    pisániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pissáán
    vijđániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vijđán
    luáčániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luáččán
    liäčániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liäččán
    väldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oovdân
    ceggâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceggân
    soggâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soggân
    valgâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: valgân
    šohâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šoohân
    čokkâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čokkân
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skeŋkkân
    snorâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snoorrân
    murâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muurrân
    suddâluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oohtân
    väldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuotân
    muttâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muttân
    hevâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heevvân
    levâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leevvân
    luovâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luovvân
    čuovâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuovvân
    lozzâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lozzân
    sevŋâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävŋân
    lozzâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ložžân
    luŋâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luuŋŋân
    stirccođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stircco
    piccoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pico
    lonnjoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lonjo
    sonnjoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sonjo
    loijoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lojo
    nivkkođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nivkko
    silluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: silo
    čolloođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čolo
    pimmoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pimo
    kummoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kumo
    innoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ino
    ubbuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ubboo
    irduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: irdoo
    jođguđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juáđgoo
    ávjuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ávjoo
    silluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: silloo
    nuolluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuálloo
    liävluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liävloo
    vonnuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vannoo
    kavnuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kávnoo
    sáppuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sáppoo
    tuorruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuárroo
    maksuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máksoo
    kiessuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiässoo
    čihtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čihtoo
    ruossâlistuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruossâlistoo
    justuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: justoo
    kuostuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuástoo
    mestuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: miästoo
    kevttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiävttoo
    tiettuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiättoo
    meriduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meriduvvoo
    siävuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävuttuvvoo
    máttááttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máttááttuvvoo
    valmâštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: valmâštuvvoo
    veeđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäđđoo
    šnurroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šnuro
    russoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruso
    čođđoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čođo
    paččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paččo
    muggâriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muggâr
    patâriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paattâr
    njamasiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njammaas
    tapčasiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tapčas
    kočâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: näähkis
    puánjostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puánjoos
    kuáikkusiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáikkus
    nuálusiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuállus
    čuávdásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávdás
    kárgásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kárgás
    ruáhásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáhás
    tuájásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuáijás
    kákkásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kákkás
    tiäivásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäivás
    ponjásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ponnjáás
    čolásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čolláás
    nuáđásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuáđđás
    riäčásiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riäččás
    paddâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paddâs
    vieggâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vieggâs
    sargâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sargâs
    heŋgâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heeŋgâs
    ornijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jieijâs
    puŋkkááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jieijâs
    romnjâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roomnjâs
    lanjâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: laannjâs
    punjâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: punnjâs
    teškâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teškâs
    nuolâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuollâs
    njommâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njommâs
    jurmâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurmâs
    njulppâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njulppâs
    toppâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toppâs
    kuorâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuorrâs
    tuorâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuorrâs
    kovrâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koovrâs
    rottâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rottâs
    tivtâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiivtâs
    tebžâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tebžâs
    čiehčâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiehčâs
    hapattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: happaat
    kapšattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kapšaat
    njalčattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njalččaat
    jalkkaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalkkat
    navkkaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: navkkat
    kannattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kannat
    pappaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pappat
    soicettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooicet
    cicettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cicceet
    skircettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skircceet
    njadettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddeet
    kodettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koddeet
    paldettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paldeet
    kirdettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kirdeet
    murdettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: murdeet
    čalgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čalgeet
    jorgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jorgeet
    hurgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurgeet
    fiŋgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fiŋgeet
    nahettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nahheet
    jalhettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalheet
    vyejettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyejeet
    pajettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paijeet
    kirjettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kirjeet
    časkettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: časkeet
    noskettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: noskeet
    haŋkettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haŋkeet
    kiškettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiškeet
    elettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eeleet
    skilettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiileet
    čovlettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čovleet
    himettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiimeet
    kalmettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalmeet
    komettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koomeet
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaneet
    vanettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaaneet
    kašnettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kašneet
    ripettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rippeet
    njalpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njalppeet
    njolpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njolppeet
    njulpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njulppeet
    kurpettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kurppeet
    smierettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiereet
    pyerettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pyereet
    morettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mooreet
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lasseet
    pasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: passeet
    nistettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nisteet
    sutettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sutteet
    tarvettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tarveet
    kavettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavveet
    šuvettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuvveet
    pozettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pozzeet
    mieđettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mieđeet
    tieđettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tieđeet
    iđettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iiđeet
    jođettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joođeet
    rišettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riššeet
    pulčettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pulččeet
    sovčettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovččeet
    kuikettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuiket
    livkettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liivket
    nivsettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: niivset
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: háccáht
    savadittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savadit
    saŋadittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saŋadit
    kyedittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kyeddit
    cuáŋuidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuáŋuidit
    sáváidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sáváidit
    kuđáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuđáidit
    tuoldiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuoldit
    väldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vääldit
    lendittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leendit
    nuávdittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuávdit
    ruávdádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruávdádit
    koškádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koškádit
    tálvádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tálvádit
    čielgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čielgit
    vargiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vargit
    čergiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čergit
    suorgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suorgit
    heŋgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heeŋgit
    pieđgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pieđgit
    stuŋgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuŋgit
    tuhhiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuhhit
    pelhittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peelhit
    jähittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jäähit
    päjittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pääijit
    härjittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häärjit
    äjittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ääjit
    lakkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lakkit
    vekittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veekkit
    viekkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viekkit
    kolkkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolkkit
    cuovkkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuovkkit
    herkittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heerkit
    vajaskittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vajaskit
    paskiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paskit
    latkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: latkit
    potkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: potkit
    jävkittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jäävkit
    pävkittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: päävkit
    peškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peeškit
    teškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teeškit
    ryeškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ryeškit
    rämškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: räämškit
    njuškiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškit
    fäškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fääškit
    käškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kääškit
    kalliittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kallit
    volliittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vollit
    kälittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: käälit
    čälittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čäälit
    čummiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čummit
    ärmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: äärmit
    tuámittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuámit
    jämittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jäämit
    šämittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šäämit
    päinittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pääinit
    enittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eennit
    vuálánittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuálánit
